Illinois, session 104th, HB5261.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 5Act is amended by changing Section 3.50 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 50/3.50)7    Sec. 3.50. Emergency Medical Services personnel licensure 8levels. 9    (a) "Emergency Medical Technician" or "EMT" means a person 10who has successfully completed a course in basic life support 11as approved by the Department, is currently licensed by the 12Department in accordance with standards prescribed by this Act 13and rules adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and 14practices within an EMS System. A valid Emergency Medical 15Technician-Basic (EMT-B) license issued under this Act shall 16continue to be valid and shall be recognized as an Emergency 17Medical Technician (EMT) license until the Emergency Medical 18Technician-Basic (EMT-B) license expires. 19    (b) "Emergency Medical Technician-Intermediate" or "EMT-I" 20means a person who has successfully completed a course in 21intermediate life support as approved by the Department, is 22currently licensed by the Department in accordance with 23standards prescribed by this Act and rules adopted by the   HB5261- 2 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1Department pursuant to this Act, and practices within an 2Intermediate or Advanced Life Support EMS System. 3    (b-5) "Advanced Emergency Medical Technician" or "A-EMT" 4means a person who has successfully completed a course in 5basic and limited advanced emergency medical care as approved 6by the Department, is currently licensed by the Department in 7accordance with standards prescribed by this Act and rules 8adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and practices 9within an Intermediate or Advanced Life Support EMS System. 10    (c) "Paramedic (EMT-P)" means a person who has 11successfully completed a course in advanced life support care 12as approved by the Department, is licensed by the Department 13in accordance with standards prescribed by this Act and rules 14adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and practices 15within an Advanced Life Support EMS System. A valid Emergency 16Medical Technician-Paramedic (EMT-P) license issued under this 17Act shall continue to be valid and shall be recognized as a 18Paramedic license until the Emergency Medical 19Technician-Paramedic (EMT-P) license expires. 20    (c-5) "Emergency Medical Responder" or "EMR (First 21Responder)" means a person who has successfully completed a 22course in emergency medical response as approved by the 23Department and provides emergency medical response services in 24accordance with the level of care established by the National 25EMS Educational Standards Emergency Medical Responder course 26as modified by the Department, or who provides services as   HB5261- 3 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1part of an EMS System response plan, as approved by the 2Department, of that EMS System. The Department shall have the 3authority to adopt rules governing the curriculum, practice, 4and necessary equipment applicable to Emergency Medical 5Responders.6    On August 15, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 798-973), a person who is licensed by the Department as a First 8Responder and has completed a Department-approved course in 9first responder defibrillator training based on, or equivalent 10to, the National EMS Educational Standards or other standards 11previously recognized by the Department shall be eligible for 12licensure as an Emergency Medical Responder upon meeting the 13licensure requirements and submitting an application to the 14Department. A valid First Responder license issued under this 15Act shall continue to be valid and shall be recognized as an 16Emergency Medical Responder license until the First Responder 17license expires.18    (c-10) All EMS Systems and licensees shall be fully 19compliant with the National EMS Education Standards, as 20modified by the Department in administrative rules, within 24 21months after the adoption of the administrative rules. 22    (d) The Department shall have the authority and 23responsibility to:24        (1) Prescribe education and training requirements, 25    which includes training in the use of epinephrine, for all 26    levels of EMS personnel except for EMRs, based on the   HB5261- 4 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    National EMS Educational Standards and any modifications 2    to those curricula specified by the Department through 3    rules adopted pursuant to this Act.4            (A) A failure rate per course of 30% or greater at 5        the first attempt on the licensure examination shall 6        require the EMS System to submit a quality improvement 7        plan to the Department. The EMS System shall share 8        failure rates with the EMS Lead Instructor quarterly. 9        Neither the EMS System nor the Department may take 10        licensure action against an EMS Lead Instructor based 11        solely on first-attempt pass rates.12            (B) Candidates shall complete the licensure 13        examination within the timeline required by the NREMT. 14            (C) An accredited Paramedic program shall be 15        conducted only by an EMS System or an academic 16        institution whose curriculum has been approved by the 17        EMS System. An EMS System associate hospital may allow 18        students from an EMS System-approved and 19        Department-approved Paramedic course to complete 20        clinical rotations as approved by the EMS System 21        Medical Director. The approval by the EMS System 22        Medical Director may not be unreasonably denied.23        (2) Prescribe licensure testing requirements for all 24    levels of EMS personnel, which shall include a requirement 25    that all phases of instruction, training, and field 26    experience be completed before taking the appropriate   HB5261- 5 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    licensure examination. Candidates shall take the 2    appropriate National Registry examination. In prescribing 3    licensure testing requirements for honorably discharged 4    members of the armed forces of the United States under 5    this paragraph (2), the Department shall ensure that a 6    candidate's military emergency medical training, emergency 7    medical curriculum completed, and clinical experience, as 8    described in paragraph (2.5), are recognized. 9        (2.5) Review applications for EMS personnel licensure 10    from honorably discharged members of the armed forces of 11    the United States with military emergency medical 12    training. Applications shall be filed with the Department 13    within one year after military discharge and shall 14    contain: (i) proof of successful completion of military 15    emergency medical training; (ii) a detailed description of 16    the emergency medical curriculum completed; and (iii) a 17    detailed description of the applicant's clinical 18    experience. The Department may request additional and 19    clarifying information. The Department shall evaluate the 20    application, including the applicant's training and 21    experience, consistent with the standards set forth under 22    subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 3.10. If the 23    application clearly demonstrates that the training and 24    experience meet such standards, the Department shall offer 25    the applicant the opportunity to successfully complete a 26    Department-approved EMS personnel examination for the   HB5261- 6 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    level of license for which the applicant is qualified. 2    Upon passage of an examination, the Department shall issue 3    a license, which shall be subject to all provisions of 4    this Act that are otherwise applicable to the level of EMS 5    personnel license issued. 6        (3) License individuals as an EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, 7    or Paramedic who have met the Department's education, 8    training and examination requirements.9        (4) Prescribe annual continuing education and 10    relicensure requirements for all EMS personnel licensure 11    levels. 12        (5) Relicense individuals as an EMD, EMR, EMT, EMT-I, 13    A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or Paramedic every 4 years, 14    based on their compliance with continuing education and 15    relicensure requirements as required by the Department 16    pursuant to this Act. Every 4 years, a Paramedic shall 17    have 100 hours of approved continuing education, an EMT-I 18    and an advanced EMT shall have 80 hours of approved 19    continuing education, and an EMT shall have 60 hours of 20    approved continuing education. An Illinois licensed EMR, 21    EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHPA, PHAPRN, or 22    PHRN whose license has been expired for less than 36 23    months may apply for reinstatement by the Department. 24    Reinstatement shall require that the applicant (i) submit 25    satisfactory proof of completion of continuing medical 26    education and clinical requirements to be prescribed by   HB5261- 7 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    the Department in an administrative rule; (ii) submit a 2    positive recommendation from an Illinois EMS Medical 3    Director attesting to the applicant's qualifications for 4    retesting; and (iii) pass a Department approved test for 5    the level of EMS personnel license sought to be 6    reinstated.7        (6) Grant inactive status to any EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, 8    A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or PHRN who 9    qualifies, based on standards and procedures established 10    by the Department in rules adopted pursuant to this Act.11        (7) Charge a fee for EMS personnel examination, 12    licensure, and license renewal.13        (8) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the 14    license of any licensee, after an opportunity for an 15    impartial hearing before a neutral administrative law 16    judge appointed by the Director, where the preponderance 17    of the evidence shows one or more of the following:18            (A) The licensee has not met continuing education 19        or relicensure requirements as prescribed by the 20        Department;21            (B) The licensee has failed to maintain 22        proficiency in the level of skills for which he or she 23        is licensed;24            (C) The licensee, during the provision of medical 25        services, engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or 26        unprofessional conduct of a character likely to   HB5261- 8 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        deceive, defraud, or harm the public;2            (D) The licensee has failed to maintain or has 3        violated standards of performance and conduct as 4        prescribed by the Department in rules adopted pursuant 5        to this Act or his or her EMS System's Program Plan;6            (E) The licensee is physically impaired to the 7        extent that he or she cannot physically perform the 8        skills and functions for which he or she is licensed, 9        as verified by a physician, unless the person is on 10        inactive status pursuant to Department regulations;11            (F) The licensee is mentally impaired to the 12        extent that he or she cannot exercise the appropriate 13        judgment, skill and safety for performing the 14        functions for which he or she is licensed, as verified 15        by a physician, unless the person is on inactive 16        status pursuant to Department regulations;17            (G) The licensee has violated this Act or any rule 18        adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act; or19            (H) The licensee has been convicted (or entered a 20        plea of guilty or nolo contendere) by a court of 21        competent jurisdiction of a felony murder, a Class X, 22        Class 1, or Class 2 felony in this State or an 23        out-of-state equivalent offense. 24        (9) Prescribe education and training requirements in 25    the administration and use of opioid antagonists for all 26    levels of EMS personnel based on the National EMS   HB5261- 9 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    Educational Standards and any modifications to those 2    curricula specified by the Department through rules 3    adopted pursuant to this Act. 4    (d-5) An EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, 5PHAPRN, PHPA, or PHRN who is a member of the Illinois National 6Guard or an Illinois State Trooper or who exclusively serves 7as a volunteer for units of local government with a population 8base of less than 5,000 or as a volunteer for a not-for-profit 9organization that serves a service area with a population base 10of less than 5,000 may submit an application to the Department 11for a waiver of the fees described under paragraph (7) of 12subsection (d) of this Section on a form prescribed by the 13Department. 14    (d-10) A person who is not an EMS personnel may operate an 15EMS vehicle pursuant to this Act if the following requirements 16are met: (i) the person meets the requirements of Section 1711-1421 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; (ii) 2 18Department-licensed EMS personnel are present and have met 19educational requirements prescribed by the Department; and 20(iii) the clinical condition of the patient necessitates the 21involvement of additional licensed personnel to ensure 22appropriate assessment, treatment, and patient safety. If a 23waiver is issued by the Department, the person who is not an 24EMS personnel may operate the EMS vehicle if only one EMS 25personnel is present. Upon request, the Department may issue a 26retroactive waiver when appropriate.   HB5261- 10 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    The education requirements prescribed by the Department 2under this Section must allow for the suspension of those 3requirements in the case of a member of the armed services or 4reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 5National Guard who is on active duty pursuant to an executive 6order of the President of the United States, an act of the 7Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor at 8the time that the member would otherwise be required to 9fulfill a particular education requirement. Such a person must 10fulfill the education requirement within 6 months after his or 11her release from active duty. 12    (e) In the event that any rule of the Department or an EMS 13Medical Director that requires testing for drug use as a 14condition of the applicable EMS personnel license conflicts 15with or duplicates a provision of a collective bargaining 16agreement that requires testing for drug use, that rule shall 17not apply to any person covered by the collective bargaining 18agreement.19    (f) At the time of applying for or renewing his or her 20license, an applicant for a license or license renewal may 21submit an email address to the Department. The Department 22shall keep the email address on file as a form of contact for 23the individual. The Department shall send license renewal 24notices electronically and by mail to a licensee who provides 25the Department with his or her email address. The notices 26shall be sent at least 60 days prior to the expiration date of   HB5261- 11 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1the license. 2(Source: P.A. 104-362, eff. 8-15-25.) 3    Section 10. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 4changing Sections 1-7 and 5-715 as follows: 5    (705 ILCS 405/1-7)6    Sec. 1-7. Confidentiality of juvenile law enforcement and 7municipal ordinance violation records. 8    (A) All juvenile law enforcement records which have not 9been expunged are confidential and may never be disclosed to 10the general public or otherwise made widely available. 11Juvenile law enforcement records may be obtained only under 12this Section and Section 1-8 and Part 9 of Article V of this 13Act, when their use is needed for good cause and with an order 14from the juvenile court, as required by those not authorized 15to retain them. Inspection, copying, and disclosure of 16juvenile law enforcement records maintained by law enforcement 17agencies or records of municipal ordinance violations 18maintained by any State, local, or municipal agency that 19relate to a minor who has been investigated, arrested, or 20taken into custody before the minor's 18th birthday shall be 21restricted to the following:22        (0.05) The minor who is the subject of the juvenile 23    law enforcement record, the minor's parents, guardian, and 24    counsel.   HB5261- 12 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        (0.10) Judges of the circuit court and members of the 2    staff of the court designated by the judge. 3        (0.15) An administrative adjudication hearing officer 4    or members of the staff designated to assist in the 5    administrative adjudication process. 6        (1) Any local, State, or federal law enforcement 7    officers or designated law enforcement staff of any 8    jurisdiction or agency when necessary for the discharge of 9    their official duties during the investigation or 10    prosecution of a crime or relating to a minor who has been 11    adjudicated delinquent and there has been a previous 12    finding that the act which constitutes the previous 13    offense was committed in furtherance of criminal 14    activities by a criminal street gang, or, when necessary 15    for the discharge of its official duties in connection 16    with a particular investigation of the conduct of a law 17    enforcement officer, an independent agency or its staff 18    created by ordinance and charged by a unit of local 19    government with the duty of investigating the conduct of 20    law enforcement officers. For purposes of this Section, 21    "criminal street gang" has the meaning ascribed to it in 22    Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 23    Prevention Act.24        (2) Prosecutors, public defenders, probation officers, 25    social workers, or other individuals assigned by the court 26    to conduct a pre-adjudication or pre-disposition   HB5261- 13 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    investigation, and individuals responsible for supervising 2    or providing temporary or permanent care and custody for 3    minors under the order of the juvenile court, when 4    essential to performing their responsibilities.5        (3) Federal, State, or local prosecutors, public 6    defenders, probation officers, and designated staff:7            (a) in the course of a trial when institution of 8        criminal proceedings has been permitted or required 9        under Section 5-805;10            (b) when institution of criminal proceedings has 11        been permitted or required under Section 5-805 and the 12        minor is the subject of a proceeding to determine the 13        conditions of pretrial release;14            (c) when criminal proceedings have been permitted 15        or required under Section 5-805 and the minor is the 16        subject of a pre-trial investigation, pre-sentence 17        investigation, fitness hearing, or proceedings on an 18        application for probation; or19            (d) in the course of prosecution or administrative 20        adjudication of a violation of a traffic, boating, or 21        fish and game law, or a county or municipal ordinance. 22        (4) Adult and Juvenile Prisoner Review Board.23        (5) Authorized military personnel.24        (5.5) Employees of the federal government authorized 25    by law. 26        (6) Persons engaged in bona fide research, with the   HB5261- 14 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    permission of the Presiding Judge and the chief executive 2    of the respective law enforcement agency; provided that 3    publication of such research results in no disclosure of a 4    minor's identity and protects the confidentiality of the 5    minor's record.6        (7) Department of Children and Family Services child 7    protection investigators acting in their official 8    capacity.9        (8) The appropriate school official only if the agency 10    or officer believes that there is an imminent threat of 11    physical harm to students, school personnel, or others.12            (A) Inspection and copying shall be limited to 13        juvenile law enforcement records transmitted to the 14        appropriate school official or officials whom the 15        school has determined to have a legitimate educational 16        or safety interest by a local law enforcement agency 17        under a reciprocal reporting system established and 18        maintained between the school district and the local 19        law enforcement agency under Section 10-20.14 of the 20        School Code concerning a minor enrolled in a school 21        within the school district who has been arrested or 22        taken into custody for any of the following offenses:23                (i) any violation of Article 24 of the 24            Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 25            2012;26                (ii) a violation of the Illinois Controlled   HB5261- 15 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            Substances Act;2                (iii) a violation of the Cannabis Control Act;3                (iii-5) a violation of Section 9-1.3 of the 4            Criminal Code of 2012; 5                (iv) a forcible felony as defined in Section 6            2-8 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 7            Code of 2012;8                (v) a violation of the Methamphetamine Control 9            and Community Protection Act; 10                (vi) a violation of Section 1-2 of the 11            Harassing and Obscene Communications Act; 12                (vii) a violation of the Hazing Act; or 13                (viii) a violation of Section 12-1, 12-2, 14            12-3, 12-3.05, 12-3.1, 12-3.2, 12-3.4, 12-3.5, 15            12-5, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 12-7.5, 25-1, or 25-5 of the 16            Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 17            2012. 18            The information derived from the juvenile law 19        enforcement records shall be kept separate from and 20        shall not become a part of the official school record 21        of that child and shall not be a public record. The 22        information shall be used solely by the appropriate 23        school official or officials whom the school has 24        determined to have a legitimate educational or safety 25        interest to aid in the proper rehabilitation of the 26        child and to protect the safety of students and   HB5261- 16 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        employees in the school. If the designated law 2        enforcement and school officials deem it to be in the 3        best interest of the minor, the student may be 4        referred to in-school or community-based social 5        services if those services are available. 6        "Rehabilitation services" may include interventions by 7        school support personnel, evaluation for eligibility 8        for special education, referrals to community-based 9        agencies such as youth services, behavioral healthcare 10        service providers, drug and alcohol prevention or 11        treatment programs, and other interventions as deemed 12        appropriate for the student. 13            (B) Any information provided to appropriate school 14        officials whom the school has determined to have a 15        legitimate educational or safety interest by local law 16        enforcement officials about a minor who is the subject 17        of a current police investigation that is directly 18        related to school safety shall consist of oral 19        information only, and not written juvenile law 20        enforcement records, and shall be used solely by the 21        appropriate school official or officials to protect 22        the safety of students and employees in the school and 23        aid in the proper rehabilitation of the child. The 24        information derived orally from the local law 25        enforcement officials shall be kept separate from and 26        shall not become a part of the official school record   HB5261- 17 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        of the child and shall not be a public record. This 2        limitation on the use of information about a minor who 3        is the subject of a current police investigation shall 4        in no way limit the use of this information by 5        prosecutors in pursuing criminal charges arising out 6        of the information disclosed during a police 7        investigation of the minor. For purposes of this 8        paragraph, "investigation" means an official 9        systematic inquiry by a law enforcement agency into 10        actual or suspected criminal activity. 11        (9) Mental health professionals on behalf of the 12    Department of Corrections or the Department of Human 13    Services or prosecutors who are evaluating, prosecuting, 14    or investigating a potential or actual petition brought 15    under the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act relating 16    to a person who is the subject of juvenile law enforcement 17    records or the respondent to a petition brought under the 18    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act who is the subject 19    of the juvenile law enforcement records sought. Any 20    juvenile law enforcement records and any information 21    obtained from those juvenile law enforcement records under 22    this paragraph (9) may be used only in sexually violent 23    persons commitment proceedings.24        (10) The president of a park district. Inspection and 25    copying shall be limited to juvenile law enforcement 26    records transmitted to the president of the park district   HB5261- 18 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    by the Illinois State Police under Section 8-23 of the 2    Park District Code or Section 16a-5 of the Chicago Park 3    District Act concerning a person who is seeking employment 4    with that park district and who has been adjudicated a 5    juvenile delinquent for any of the offenses listed in 6    subsection (c) of Section 8-23 of the Park District Code 7    or subsection (c) of Section 16a-5 of the Chicago Park 8    District Act. 9        (11) Persons managing and designated to participate in 10    a court diversion program as designated in subsection (6) 11    of Section 5-105. 12        (12) The Public Access Counselor of the Office of the 13    Attorney General, when reviewing juvenile law enforcement 14    records under its powers and duties under the Freedom of 15    Information Act. 16        (13) Collection agencies, contracted or otherwise 17    engaged by a governmental entity, to collect any debts due 18    and owing to the governmental entity. 19    (B)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no law 20enforcement officer or other person or agency may knowingly 21transmit to the Department of Corrections, the Illinois State 22Police, or the Federal Bureau of Investigation any fingerprint 23or photograph relating to a minor who has been arrested or 24taken into custody before the minor's 18th birthday, unless 25the court in proceedings under this Act authorizes the 26transmission or enters an order under Section 5-805 permitting   HB5261- 19 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1or requiring the institution of criminal proceedings.2    (2) Law enforcement officers or other persons or agencies 3shall transmit to the Illinois State Police copies of 4fingerprints and descriptions of all minors who have been 5arrested or taken into custody before their 18th birthday for 6the offense of unlawful possession of weapons under Article 24 7of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, a 8Class X or Class 1 felony, a forcible felony as defined in 9Section 2-8 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 10of 2012, or a Class 2 or greater felony under the Cannabis 11Control Act, the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the 12Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, or 13Chapter 4 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, pursuant to Section 5 14of the Criminal Identification Act. Information reported to 15the Department pursuant to this Section may be maintained with 16records that the Department files pursuant to Section 2.1 of 17the Criminal Identification Act. Nothing in this Act prohibits 18a law enforcement agency from fingerprinting a minor taken 19into custody or arrested before the minor's 18th birthday for 20an offense other than those listed in this paragraph (2).21    (C) The records of law enforcement officers, or of an 22independent agency created by ordinance and charged by a unit 23of local government with the duty of investigating the conduct 24of law enforcement officers, concerning all minors under 18 25years of age must be maintained separate from the records of 26arrests and may not be open to public inspection or their   HB5261- 20 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1contents disclosed to the public. For purposes of obtaining 2documents under this Section, a civil subpoena is not an order 3of the court.4        (1) In cases where the law enforcement, or independent 5    agency, records concern a pending juvenile court case, the 6    party seeking to inspect the records shall provide actual 7    notice to the attorney or guardian ad litem of the minor 8    whose records are sought.9        (2) In cases where the records concern a juvenile 10    court case that is no longer pending, the party seeking to 11    inspect the records shall provide actual notice to the 12    minor or the minor's parent or legal guardian, and the 13    matter shall be referred to the chief judge presiding over 14    matters pursuant to this Act.15        (3) In determining whether the records should be 16    available for inspection, the court shall consider the 17    minor's interest in confidentiality and rehabilitation 18    over the moving party's interest in obtaining the 19    information. Any records obtained in violation of this 20    subsection (C) shall not be admissible in any criminal or 21    civil proceeding, or operate to disqualify a minor from 22    subsequently holding public office or securing employment, 23    or operate as a forfeiture of any public benefit, right, 24    privilege, or right to receive any license granted by 25    public authority. 26    (D) Nothing contained in subsection (C) of this Section   HB5261- 21 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1shall prohibit the inspection or disclosure to victims and 2witnesses of photographs contained in the records of law 3enforcement agencies when the inspection and disclosure is 4conducted in the presence of a law enforcement officer for the 5purpose of the identification or apprehension of any person 6subject to the provisions of this Act or for the investigation 7or prosecution of any crime.8    (E) Law enforcement officers, and personnel of an 9independent agency created by ordinance and charged by a unit 10of local government with the duty of investigating the conduct 11of law enforcement officers, may not disclose the identity of 12any minor in releasing information to the general public as to 13the arrest, investigation or disposition of any case involving 14a minor.15    (F) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit law 16enforcement agencies from communicating with each other by 17letter, memorandum, teletype, or intelligence alert bulletin 18or other means the identity or other relevant information 19pertaining to a person under 18 years of age if there are 20reasonable grounds to believe that the person poses a real and 21present danger to the safety of the public or law enforcement 22officers. The information provided under this subsection (F) 23shall remain confidential and shall not be publicly disclosed, 24except as otherwise allowed by law.25    (G) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the right of a 26Civil Service Commission or appointing authority of any   HB5261- 22 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1federal government, state, county or municipality examining 2the character and fitness of an applicant for employment with 3a law enforcement agency, correctional institution, or fire 4department from obtaining and examining the records of any law 5enforcement agency relating to any record of the applicant 6having been arrested or taken into custody before the 7applicant's 18th birthday.8    (G-5) Information identifying victims and alleged victims 9of sex offenses shall not be disclosed or open to the public 10under any circumstances. Nothing in this Section shall 11prohibit the victim or alleged victim of any sex offense from 12voluntarily disclosing this identity. 13    (H) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 98-61 14apply to law enforcement records of a minor who has been 15arrested or taken into custody on or after January 1, 2014 (the 16effective date of Public Act 98-61). 17    (H-5) Nothing in this Section shall require any court or 18adjudicative proceeding for traffic, boating, fish and game 19law, or municipal and county ordinance violations to be closed 20to the public. 21    (I) Willful violation of this Section is a Class C 22misdemeanor and each violation is subject to a fine of $1,000. 23This subsection (I) shall not apply to the person who is the 24subject of the record.25    (J) A person convicted of violating this Section is liable 26for damages in the amount of $1,000 or actual damages,   HB5261- 23 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1whichever is greater. 2(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-752, eff. 1-1-23; 3102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-822, eff. 41-1-25.) 5    (705 ILCS 405/5-715)6    Sec. 5-715. Probation. 7    (1) The period of probation or conditional discharge shall 8not exceed 5 years or until the minor has attained the age of 921 years, whichever is less, except as provided in this 10Section for a minor who is found to be guilty for an offense 11which is first degree murder. The juvenile court may terminate 12probation or conditional discharge and discharge the minor at 13any time if warranted by the conduct of the minor and the ends 14of justice; provided, however, that the period of probation 15for a minor who is found to be guilty for an offense which is 16first degree murder shall be at least 5 years. 17    (1.1) The period of probation for a minor who is found 18guilty of felony murder shall not exceed 4 years. 19    (1.5) The period of probation for a minor who is found 20guilty of aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 21assault, or aggravated battery with a firearm shall be at 22least 36 months. The period of probation for a minor who is 23found to be guilty of any other Class X felony shall be at 24least 24 months. The period of probation for a Class 1 or Class 252 forcible felony shall be at least 18 months. Regardless of   HB5261- 24 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1the length of probation ordered by the court, for all offenses 2under this subsection (1.5), the court shall schedule hearings 3to determine whether it is in the best interest of the minor 4and public safety to terminate probation after the minimum 5period of probation has been served. In such a hearing, there 6shall be a rebuttable presumption that it is in the best 7interest of the minor and public safety to terminate 8probation.9    (2) The court may as a condition of probation or of 10conditional discharge require that the minor: 11        (a) not violate any criminal statute of any 12    jurisdiction; 13        (b) make a report to and appear in person before any 14    person or agency as directed by the court; 15        (c) work or pursue a course of study or vocational 16    training; 17        (d) undergo medical or psychiatric treatment, rendered 18    by a psychiatrist or psychological treatment rendered by a 19    clinical psychologist or social work services rendered by 20    a clinical social worker, or treatment for drug addiction 21    or alcoholism; 22        (e) attend or reside in a facility established for the 23    instruction or residence of persons on probation; 24        (f) support the minor's dependents, if any; 25        (g) refrain from possessing a firearm or other 26    dangerous weapon, or an automobile;   HB5261- 25 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        (h) permit the probation officer to visit the minor at 2    the minor's home or elsewhere; 3        (i) reside with the minor's parents or in a foster 4    home; 5        (j) attend school; 6        (j-5) with the consent of the superintendent of the 7    facility, attend an educational program at a facility 8    other than the school in which the offense was committed 9    if the minor committed a crime of violence as defined in 10    Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act in a 11    school, on the real property comprising a school, or 12    within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising a 13    school; 14        (k) attend a non-residential program for youth; 15        (l) make restitution under the terms of subsection (4) 16    of Section 5-710; 17        (m) provide nonfinancial contributions to the minor's 18    own support at home or in a foster home; 19        (n) perform some reasonable public or community 20    service that does not interfere with school hours, 21    school-related activities, or work commitments of the 22    minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; 23        (o) participate with community corrections programs 24    including unified delinquency intervention services 25    administered by the Department of Human Services subject 26    to Section 5 of the Children and Family Services Act;   HB5261- 26 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        (p) (blank); 2        (q) serve a term of home confinement. In addition to 3    any other applicable condition of probation or conditional 4    discharge, the conditions of home confinement shall be 5    that the minor: 6            (i) remain within the interior premises of the 7        place designated for the minor's confinement during 8        the hours designated by the court; 9            (ii) admit any person or agent designated by the 10        court into the minor's place of confinement at any 11        time for purposes of verifying the minor's compliance 12        with the conditions of the minor's confinement; and 13            (iii) use an approved electronic monitoring device 14        if ordered by the court subject to Article 8A of 15        Chapter V of the Unified Code of Corrections; 16        (r) refrain from entering into a designated geographic 17    area except upon terms as the court finds appropriate. The 18    terms may include consideration of the purpose of the 19    entry, the time of day, other persons accompanying the 20    minor, and advance approval by a probation officer, if the 21    minor has been placed on probation, or advance approval by 22    the court, if the minor has been placed on conditional 23    discharge; 24        (s) refrain from having any contact, directly or 25    indirectly, with certain specified persons or particular 26    types of persons, including, but not limited to, members   HB5261- 27 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    of street gangs and drug users or dealers; 2        (s-5) undergo a medical or other procedure to have a 3    tattoo symbolizing allegiance to a street gang removed 4    from the minor's body; 5        (t) refrain from having in the minor's body the 6    presence of any illicit drug prohibited by the Cannabis 7    Control Act, the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 8    the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 9    unless prescribed by a physician, and shall submit samples 10    of the minor's blood or urine or both for tests to 11    determine the presence of any illicit drug; or 12        (u) comply with other conditions as may be ordered by 13    the court. 14    (3) The court may as a condition of probation or of 15conditional discharge require that a minor found guilty on any 16alcohol, cannabis, methamphetamine, or controlled substance 17violation, refrain from acquiring a driver's license during 18the period of probation or conditional discharge. If the minor 19is in possession of a permit or license, the court may require 20that the minor refrain from driving or operating any motor 21vehicle during the period of probation or conditional 22discharge, except as may be necessary in the course of the 23minor's lawful employment. 24    (3.5) The court shall, as a condition of probation or of 25conditional discharge, require that a minor found to be guilty 26and placed on probation for reasons that include a violation   HB5261- 28 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1of Section 3.02 or Section 3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals 2Act or paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Section 21-1 of the 3Criminal Code of 2012 undergo medical or psychiatric treatment 4rendered by a psychiatrist or psychological treatment rendered 5by a clinical psychologist. The condition may be in addition 6to any other condition. 7    (3.10) The court shall order that a minor placed on 8probation or conditional discharge for a sex offense as 9defined in the Sex Offender Management Board Act undergo and 10successfully complete sex offender treatment. The treatment 11shall be in conformance with the standards developed under the 12Sex Offender Management Board Act and conducted by a treatment 13provider approved by the Board.14    (4) A minor on probation or conditional discharge shall be 15given a certificate setting forth the conditions upon which 16the minor is being released. 17    (5) (Blank). 18    (5.5) Jurisdiction over an offender may be transferred 19from the sentencing court to the court of another circuit with 20the concurrence of both courts. Further transfers or 21retransfers of jurisdiction are also authorized in the same 22manner. The court to which jurisdiction has been transferred 23shall have the same powers as the sentencing court.24    If the transfer case originated in another state and has 25been transferred under the Interstate Compact for Juveniles to 26the jurisdiction of an Illinois circuit court for supervision   HB5261- 29 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1by an Illinois probation department, probation fees may be 2imposed only if permitted by the Interstate Commission for 3Juveniles. 4    (6) The General Assembly finds that in order to protect 5the public, the juvenile justice system must compel compliance 6with the conditions of probation by responding to violations 7with swift, certain, and fair punishments and intermediate 8sanctions. The Chief Judge of each circuit shall adopt a 9system of structured, intermediate sanctions for violations of 10the terms and conditions of a sentence of supervision, 11probation, or conditional discharge, under this Act. 12    The court shall provide as a condition of a disposition of 13probation, conditional discharge, or supervision, that the 14probation agency may invoke any sanction from the list of 15intermediate sanctions adopted by the chief judge of the 16circuit court for violations of the terms and conditions of 17the sentence of probation, conditional discharge, or 18supervision, subject to the provisions of Section 5-720 of 19this Act. 20    (7) Fines and assessments, including any fee or 21administrative cost authorized under Section 5-4.5-105, 225-5-10, 5-6-3, 5-6-3.1, 5-7-6, 5-9-1.4, or 5-9-1.9 of the 23Unified Code of Corrections, shall not be ordered or imposed 24on a minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal custodian 25as a condition of probation, conditional discharge, or 26supervision. If the minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or   HB5261- 30 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1legal custodian is unable to cover the cost of a condition 2under this subsection, the court shall not preclude the minor 3from receiving probation, conditional discharge, or 4supervision based on the inability to pay. Inability to pay 5shall not be grounds to object to the minor's placement on 6probation, conditional discharge, or supervision. 7(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 8103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 9    Section 15. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 10changing Sections 8-2 and 9-1 and by adding Section 9-1.3 as 11follows: 12    (720 ILCS 5/8-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 8-2)13    Sec. 8-2. Conspiracy. 14    (a) Elements of the offense. A person commits the offense 15of conspiracy when, with intent that an offense be committed, 16he or she agrees with another to the commission of that 17offense. No person may be convicted of conspiracy to commit an 18offense unless an act in furtherance of that agreement is 19alleged and proved to have been committed by him or her or by a 20co-conspirator.21    (b) Co-conspirators. It is not a defense to conspiracy 22that the person or persons with whom the accused is alleged to 23have conspired:24        (1) have not been prosecuted or convicted,  HB5261- 31 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        (2) have been convicted of a different offense,2        (3) are not amenable to justice,3        (4) have been acquitted, or4        (5) lacked the capacity to commit an offense.5    (c) Sentence.6        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection or 7    Code, a person convicted of conspiracy to commit:8            (A) felony murder shall be sentenced for a Class X 9        felony; 10            (A-5) (A) a Class X felony shall be sentenced for a 11        Class 1 felony;12            (B) a Class 1 felony shall be sentenced for a Class 13        2 felony;14            (C) a Class 2 felony shall be sentenced for a Class 15        3 felony;16            (D) a Class 3 felony shall be sentenced for a Class 17        4 felony;18            (E) a Class 4 felony shall be sentenced for a Class 19        4 felony; and 20            (F) a misdemeanor may be fined or imprisoned or 21        both not to exceed the maximum provided for the 22        offense that is the object of the conspiracy.23        (2) A person convicted of conspiracy to commit any of 24    the following offenses shall be sentenced for a Class X 25    felony:26            (A) aggravated insurance fraud conspiracy when the   HB5261- 32 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        person is an organizer of the conspiracy (720 ILCS 2        5/46-4); or3            (B) aggravated governmental entity insurance fraud 4        conspiracy when the person is an organizer of the 5        conspiracy (720 ILCS 5/46-4).6        (3) A person convicted of conspiracy to commit any of 7    the following offenses shall be sentenced for a Class 1 8    felony:9            (A) first degree murder (720 ILCS 5/9-1); or10            (B) aggravated insurance fraud (720 ILCS 5/46-3) 11        or aggravated governmental insurance fraud (720 ILCS 12        5/46-3).13        (4) A person convicted of conspiracy to commit 14    insurance fraud (720 ILCS 5/46-3) or governmental entity 15    insurance fraud (720 ILCS 5/46-3) shall be sentenced for a 16    Class 2 felony.17        (5) A person convicted of conspiracy to commit any of 18    the following offenses shall be sentenced for a Class 3 19    felony:20            (A) soliciting for a person engaged in the sex 21        trade (720 ILCS 5/11-14.3(a)(1));22            (B) pandering (720 ILCS 5/11-14.3(a)(2)(A) or 23        5/11-14.3(a)(2)(B));24            (C) keeping a place of prostitution (720 ILCS 25        5/11-14.3(a)(1));26            (D) pimping (720 ILCS 5/11-14.3(a)(2)(C));  HB5261- 33 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            (E) unlawful possession of weapons under Section 2        24-1(a)(1) (720 ILCS 5/24-1(a)(1));3            (F) unlawful possession of weapons under Section 4        24-1(a)(7) (720 ILCS 5/24-1(a)(7));5            (G) gambling (720 ILCS 5/28-1);6            (H) keeping a gambling place (720 ILCS 5/28-3);7            (I) registration of federal gambling stamps 8        violation (720 ILCS 5/28-4);9            (J) look-alike substances violation (720 ILCS 10        570/404);11            (K) miscellaneous controlled substance violation 12        under Section 406(b) (720 ILCS 570/406(b)); or13            (L) an inchoate offense related to any of the 14        principal offenses set forth in this item (5). 15(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1071, eff. 7-1-25; 16revised 6-11-25.) 17    (720 ILCS 5/9-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 9-1)18    Sec. 9-1. First degree murder. 19    (a) A person who kills an individual without lawful 20justification commits first degree murder if, in performing 21the acts which cause the death: 22        (1) he or she either intends to kill or do great bodily 23    harm to that individual or another, or knows that such 24    acts will cause death to that individual or another; or 25        (2) he or she knows that such acts create a strong   HB5261- 34 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    probability of death or great bodily harm to that 2    individual or another; or 3        (3) (blank). he or she, acting alone or with one or 4    more participants, commits or attempts to commit a 5    forcible felony other than second degree murder, and in 6    the course of or in furtherance of such crime or flight 7    therefrom, he or she or another participant causes the 8    death of a person. 9    (b) (Blank). 10    (b-5) (Blank). 11    (c) (Blank). 12    (d) (Blank). 13    (e) (Blank). 14    (f) (Blank). 15    (g) (Blank). 16    (h) (Blank). 17    (h-5) (Blank). 18    (i) (Blank). 19    (j) (Blank). 20    (k) (Blank). 21(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 22    (720 ILCS 5/9-1.3 new)23    Sec. 9-1.3. Felony murder.24    (a) A person commits felony murder when he or she, acting 25alone or with one or more participants, commits or attempts to   HB5261- 35 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1commit a forcible felony, other than second degree murder, and 2in the course of or in furtherance of that crime or flight from 3that crime, he or she or another participant causes the death 4of a person, other than one of the participants.5    (b) Sentence. Felony murder is a separate class of felony 6and shall be punished as provided in Section 5-4.5-21 of the 7Unified Code of Corrections.  8    Section 20. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 9amended by changing Sections 104-25 and 110-6.1 as follows: 10    (725 ILCS 5/104-25)  (from Ch. 38, par. 104-25)11    Sec. 104-25. Discharge hearing. 12    (a) As provided for in paragraph (a) of Section 104-23 and 13subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of Section 104-23 a hearing 14to determine the sufficiency of the evidence shall be held. 15Such hearing shall be conducted by the court without a jury. 16The State and the defendant may introduce evidence relevant to 17the question of defendant's guilt of the crime charged.18    The court may admit hearsay or affidavit evidence on 19secondary matters such as testimony to establish the chain of 20possession of physical evidence, laboratory reports, 21authentication of transcripts taken by official reporters, 22court and business records, and public documents.23    (b) If the evidence does not prove the defendant guilty 24beyond a reasonable doubt, the court shall enter a judgment of   HB5261- 36 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1acquittal; however nothing herein shall prevent the State from 2requesting the court to commit the defendant to the Department 3of Human Services under the provisions of the Mental Health 4and Developmental Disabilities Code.5    (c) If the defendant is found not guilty by reason of 6insanity, the court shall enter a judgment of acquittal and 7the proceedings after acquittal by reason of insanity under 8Section 5-2-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections shall apply.9    (d) If the discharge hearing does not result in an 10acquittal of the charge the defendant may be remanded for 11further treatment and the one year time limit set forth in 12Section 104-23 shall be extended as follows: 13        (1) If the most serious charge upon which the State 14    sustained its burden of proof was felony murder, a Class 15    1, or Class X felony, the treatment period may be extended 16    up to a maximum treatment period of 2 years; if a Class 2, 17    3, or 4 felony, the treatment period may be extended up to 18    a maximum of 15 months; 19        (2) If the State sustained its burden of proof on a 20    charge of first degree murder, the treatment period may be 21    extended up to a maximum treatment period of 5 years.22    (e) Transcripts of testimony taken at a discharge hearing 23may be admitted in evidence at a subsequent trial of the case, 24subject to the rules of evidence, if the witness who gave such 25testimony is legally unavailable at the time of the subsequent 26trial.  HB5261- 37 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    (f) If the court fails to enter an order of acquittal the 2defendant may appeal from such judgment in the same manner 3provided for an appeal from a conviction in a criminal case.4    (g) At the expiration of an extended period of treatment 5ordered pursuant to this Section: 6        (1) Upon a finding that the defendant is fit or can be 7    rendered fit consistent with Section 104-22, the court may 8    proceed with trial. 9        (2) If the defendant continues to be unfit to stand 10    trial, the court shall determine whether he or she is 11    subject to involuntary admission under the Mental Health 12    and Developmental Disabilities Code or constitutes a 13    serious threat to the public safety. If so found, the 14    defendant shall be remanded to the Department of Human 15    Services for further treatment and shall be treated in the 16    same manner as a civilly committed patient for all 17    purposes, except that the original court having 18    jurisdiction over the defendant shall be required to 19    approve any conditional release or discharge of the 20    defendant, for the period of commitment equal to the 21    maximum sentence to which the defendant would have been 22    subject had he or she been convicted in a criminal 23    proceeding. During this period of commitment, the original 24    court having jurisdiction over the defendant shall hold 25    hearings under clause (i) of this paragraph (2). However, 26    if the defendant is remanded to the Department of Human   HB5261- 38 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    Services, the defendant shall be placed in a secure 2    setting unless the court determines that there are 3    compelling reasons why such placement is not necessary. 4        If the defendant does not have a current treatment 5    plan, then within 3 days of admission under this 6    subdivision (g)(2), a treatment plan shall be prepared for 7    each defendant and entered into his or her record. The 8    plan shall include (i) an assessment of the defendant's 9    treatment needs, (ii) a description of the services 10    recommended for treatment, (iii) the goals of each type of 11    element of service, (iv) an anticipated timetable for the 12    accomplishment of the goals, and (v) a designation of the 13    qualified professional responsible for the implementation 14    of the plan. The plan shall be reviewed and updated as the 15    clinical condition warrants, but not less than every 30 16    days. 17        Every 90 days after the initial admission under this 18    subdivision (g)(2), the facility director shall file a 19    typed treatment plan report with the original court having 20    jurisdiction over the defendant. The report shall include 21    an opinion as to whether the defendant is fit to stand 22    trial and whether the defendant is currently subject to 23    involuntary admission, in need of mental health services 24    on an inpatient basis, or in need of mental health 25    services on an outpatient basis. The report shall also 26    summarize the basis for those findings and provide a   HB5261- 39 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    current summary of the 5 items required in a treatment 2    plan. A copy of the report shall be forwarded to the clerk 3    of the court, the State's Attorney, and the defendant's 4    attorney if the defendant is represented by counsel. 5        The court on its own motion may order a hearing to 6    review the treatment plan. The defendant or the State's 7    Attorney may request a treatment plan review every 90 days 8    and the court shall review the current treatment plan to 9    determine whether the plan complies with the requirements 10    of this Section. The court may order an independent 11    examination on its own initiative and shall order such an 12    evaluation if either the recipient or the State's Attorney 13    so requests and has demonstrated to the court that the 14    plan cannot be effectively reviewed by the court without 15    such an examination. Under no circumstances shall the 16    court be required to order an independent examination 17    pursuant to this Section more than once each year. The 18    examination shall be conducted by a psychiatrist or 19    clinical psychologist as defined in Section 1-103 of the 20    Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code who is 21    not in the employ of the Department of Human Services. 22        If, during the period within which the defendant is 23    confined in a secure setting, the court enters an order 24    that requires the defendant to appear, the court shall 25    timely transmit a copy of the order or writ to the director 26    of the particular Department of Human Services facility   HB5261- 40 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    where the defendant resides authorizing the transportation 2    of the defendant to the court for the purpose of the 3    hearing. 4            (i) 180 days after a defendant is remanded to the 5        Department of Human Services, under paragraph (2), and 6        every 180 days thereafter for so long as the defendant 7        is confined under the order entered thereunder, the 8        court shall set a hearing and shall direct that notice 9        of the time and place of the hearing be served upon the 10        defendant, the facility director, the State's 11        Attorney, and the defendant's attorney. If requested 12        by either the State or the defense or if the court 13        determines that it is appropriate, an impartial 14        examination of the defendant by a psychiatrist or 15        clinical psychologist as defined in Section 1-103 of 16        the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code 17        who is not in the employ of the Department of Human 18        Services shall be ordered, and the report considered 19        at the time of the hearing. If the defendant is not 20        currently represented by counsel the court shall 21        appoint the public defender to represent the defendant 22        at the hearing. The court shall make a finding as to 23        whether the defendant is: 24                (A) subject to involuntary admission; or 25                (B) in need of mental health services in the 26            form of inpatient care; or   HB5261- 41 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1                (C) in need of mental health services but not 2            subject to involuntary admission nor inpatient 3            care. 4        The findings of the court shall be established by 5        clear and convincing evidence and the burden of proof 6        and the burden of going forward with the evidence 7        shall rest with the State's Attorney. Upon finding by 8        the court, the court shall enter its findings and an 9        appropriate order. 10            (ii) The terms "subject to involuntary admission", 11        "in need of mental health services in the form of 12        inpatient care" and "in need of mental health services 13        but not subject to involuntary admission nor inpatient 14        care" shall have the meanings ascribed to them in 15        clause (d)(3) of Section 5-2-4 of the Unified Code of 16        Corrections. 17        (3) If the defendant is not committed pursuant to this 18    Section, he or she shall be released. 19        (4) In no event may the treatment period be extended 20    to exceed the maximum sentence to which a defendant would 21    have been subject had he or she been convicted in a 22    criminal proceeding. For purposes of this Section, the 23    maximum sentence shall be determined by Section 5-8-1 (730 24    ILCS 5/5-8-1) or Article 4.5 of Chapter V of the "Unified 25    Code of Corrections", excluding any sentence of natural 26    life.  HB5261- 42 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1(Source: P.A. 95-1052, eff. 7-1-09.) 2    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)3    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 4    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 5hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 6if:7        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 8    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 9    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 10    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 11    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 12    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 13    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 14    or persons or the community, based on the specific 15    articulable facts of the case;16        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 17    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 18    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 19    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible 20    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 21    first degree murder, felony murder, second degree murder, 22    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 23    criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed 24    robbery, aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there 25    is use of force against another person, residential   HB5261- 43 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    burglary, home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated 2    arson, arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated 3    battery resulting in great bodily harm or permanent 4    disability or disfigurement, or any other felony which 5    involves the threat of or infliction of great bodily harm 6    or permanent disability or disfigurement; 7        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 8    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 9    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 10    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 11    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 12    of the threat upon which the charge is based;13        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 14    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 15    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 16    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 17    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or a civil no contact 18    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 19    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 20    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 21    or persons or the community, based on the specific 22    articulable facts of the case;23        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 24    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 25    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 26    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present   HB5261- 44 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 2    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 3    case;4        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 5    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 6    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 7    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 8    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 9    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 10    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 11    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 12    the case; 13        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 14    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 15    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 16    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 17    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 18    of the case:19            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 20        firearm);21            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated discharge of a 22        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 23        designed or used for silencing the report of a 24        firearm);25            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 26        firearm);  HB5261- 45 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 2        firearm by a repeat felony offender);3            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 4        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 5        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 6        or flechette shells);7            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 8        firearms);9            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 10        firearms on the premises of any school);11            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 12        liquor license);13            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 14        firearm);15            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);16            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);17            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);18            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 19        of a minor);20            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);21            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 22        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 23        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 24        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 25        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 26        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9);   HB5261- 46 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 2        manslaughter);3            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);4            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);5            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 6        endangerment);7            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 8            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 9        restraint); 10            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 11            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 12        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 13        discharge of a firearm); 14        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 15    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 16    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 17    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 18    the specific articulable facts of the case: 19            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 20        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 21        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);22            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 23        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 24        influence while operating a school bus with 25        passengers);26            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the   HB5261- 47 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 2        influence causing great bodily harm);3            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 4        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 5        influence after a previous reckless homicide 6        conviction);7            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 8        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 9        influence leading to death); or10            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 11        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 12        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 13        under the age of 16);14        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 15    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 16    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 17    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 18    persons or the community, based on the specific 19    articulable facts of the case; or 20        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 21    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:22            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 23        through (a)(7) of this Section; or24            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 25    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 26detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is   HB5261- 48 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 2a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 3been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 4indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 5probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 6finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 7misdemeanor.8    (c) Timing of petition. 9        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 10    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 11    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 12    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 13    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 14    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 15    previously released shall not be detained.16        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 17    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 18    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 19    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 20    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 21    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 22    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 23    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 24    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 25    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 26    detain or release the defendant in the time between the   HB5261- 49 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    filing of the petition and the hearing.2    (d) Contents of petition.3        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 4    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 5    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 6    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 7    persons or the community, based on the specific 8    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.9        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 10    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 11    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 12    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 13    filing of the previous petition.14    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 15for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 16proving by clear and convincing evidence that:17        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 18    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 19    subsection (a), and20        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 21    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 22    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 23    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 24    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 25    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 26    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1)   HB5261- 50 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 2    1986, and3        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 4    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 5    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 6    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 7    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 8    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 9    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 10    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and11        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 12    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 13    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 14    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 15    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 16    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 17    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 18    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 19    appear in court as required.20    (f) Conduct of the hearings.21        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 22    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 23    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 24    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 25    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 26    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the   HB5261- 51 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    hearing.2        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 3    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.4        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 5    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 6    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 7    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 8    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 9    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 10    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 11    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 12    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 13    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 14    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 15    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 16    conducted via a 2-way audio-visual communication system, 17    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 18    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 19        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 20    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 21    audio visual communication) unless the accused waives the 22    right to be present physically in court, the court 23    determines that the physical health and safety of any 24    person necessary to the proceedings would be endangered by 25    appearing in court, or the chief judge of the circuit 26    orders use of that system due to operational challenges in   HB5261- 52 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    conducting the hearing in person. Such operational 2    challenges must be documented and approved by the chief 3    judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the challenges 4    through reasonable efforts must be presented and approved 5    by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts every 6    6 months. 7        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 8    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 9    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 10    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 11    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 12    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 13    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 14    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 15    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 16    the court shall state on the record the reason for 17    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 18    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 19    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 20    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 21    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 22    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 23    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 24    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 25    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 26    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the   HB5261- 53 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 2    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 3    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 4    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 5    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 6    criminal history, if available, and any written or 7    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 8    statements made by any person, if in the State's 9    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 10        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 11    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 12    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 13    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 14    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 15    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 16    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 17    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 18    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.19        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 20    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 21    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 22    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 23    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 24    the defendant.25        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 26    release, and detention prior to trial must be   HB5261- 54 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 2    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 3    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 4    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 5dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 6defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 7person or persons or the community, based on the specific 8articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 9limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:10        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 11    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 12    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.13        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 14    including:15            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 16        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 17        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 18        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 19        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 20        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.21            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 22        psychiatric or other similar social history which 23        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 24        nature, or lack of any such history.25        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 26    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the   HB5261- 55 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    nature of the threat.2        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 3    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 4    them.5        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.6        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 7    complaining witness. 8        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 9    access to any weapon or weapons.10        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 11    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 12    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 13    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 14    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 15    federal or State law.16        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 17    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 18    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 19    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 20    or lack of such behavior.21    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 22detention:23        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 24    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 25    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 26    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to   HB5261- 56 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 2    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 3    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;4        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 5    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 6    pending trial;7        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 8    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 9    communication with others of his or her choice by 10    visitation, mail and telephone; and11        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 12    required for appearances in connection with court 13    proceedings.14    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 15detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 16Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 17offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 18on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 19is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 20the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 21release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 22any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 23the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 24from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 25good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.26    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant   HB5261- 57 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 2is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 3of any person or persons or the community, based on the 4specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 5defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 6    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 7entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 8denying his or her pretrial release.9    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 10this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 11release.12    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 13shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 14defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 15proceedings.16    (m) Interest of victims. 17        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 18    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 19    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 20    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 21    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 22        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 23    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 24    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 25    defendant remains in custody. 26(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)   HB5261- 58 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    Section 25. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 2changing Sections 3-2.5-80, 3-14-2, 5-4.5-10, 5-4.5-95, 5-7-1, 3and 5-8-1 and by adding Section 5-4.5-21 as follows: 4    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.5-80)5    Sec. 3-2.5-80. Supervision on aftercare release.6    (a) The Department shall retain custody of all youth 7placed on aftercare release or released under Section 3-2.5-85 8or 3-3-10 of this Code. The Department shall supervise those 9youth during their aftercare release period in accordance with 10the conditions set by the Department or Prisoner Review Board.11    (b) A copy of youth's conditions of aftercare release 12shall be signed by the youth and given to the youth and to his 13or her aftercare specialist who shall report on the youth's 14progress under the rules of the Department. Aftercare 15specialists and supervisors shall have the full power of peace 16officers in the retaking of any releasee who has allegedly 17violated his or her aftercare release conditions. The 18aftercare specialist may request the Department of Juvenile 19Justice to issue a warrant for the arrest of any releasee who 20has allegedly violated his or her aftercare release 21conditions.22    (c) The aftercare supervisor shall request the Department 23of Juvenile Justice to issue an aftercare release violation 24warrant, and the Department of Juvenile Justice shall issue an   HB5261- 59 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1aftercare release violation warrant, under the following 2circumstances: 3        (1) if the releasee has a subsequent delinquency 4    petition filed against him or her alleging commission of 5    an act that constitutes a felony using a firearm or knife;6        (2) if the releasee is required to and fails to comply 7    with the requirements of the Sex Offender Registration 8    Act;9        (3) (blank); or 10        (4) if the releasee is on aftercare release for a 11    murder, a felony murder, a Class X felony, or a Class 1 12    felony violation of the Criminal Code of 2012, or any 13    felony that requires registration as a sex offender under 14    the Sex Offender Registration Act and a subsequent 15    delinquency petition is filed against him or her alleging 16    commission of an act that constitutes first degree murder, 17    a felony murder, a Class X felony, a Class 1 felony, a 18    Class 2 felony, or a Class 3 felony.19    Personnel designated by the Department of Juvenile Justice 20or another peace officer may detain an alleged aftercare 21release violator until a warrant for his or her return to the 22Department of Juvenile Justice can be issued. The releasee may 23be delivered to any secure place until he or she can be 24transported to the Department of Juvenile Justice. The 25aftercare specialist or the Department of Juvenile Justice 26shall file a violation report with notice of charges with the   HB5261- 60 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1Department. 2    (d) The aftercare specialist shall regularly advise and 3consult with the releasee and assist the youth in adjusting to 4community life in accord with this Section.5    (e) If the aftercare releasee has been convicted of a sex 6offense as defined in the Sex Offender Management Board Act, 7the aftercare specialist shall periodically, but not less than 8once a month, verify that the releasee is in compliance with 9paragraph (7.6) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-7.10    (f) The aftercare specialist shall keep those records as 11the Department may require. All records shall be entered in 12the master file of the youth. 13(Source: P.A. 98-558, eff. 1-1-14; 99-268, eff. 1-1-16; 1499-628, eff. 1-1-17.) 15    (730 ILCS 5/3-14-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-2)16    Sec. 3-14-2. Supervision on Parole, Mandatory Supervised 17Release and Release by Statute.18    (a) The Department shall retain custody of all persons 19placed on parole or mandatory supervised release or released 20pursuant to Section 3-3-10 of this Code and shall supervise 21such persons during their parole or release period in accord 22with the conditions set by the Prisoner Review Board. When 23setting conditions, the Prisoner Review Board shall make an 24individualized assessment as to what conditions are 25appropriate based on the risk and needs assessment, program   HB5261- 61 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1participation and completion, assignment history while 2incarcerated, and behavior history during the period of the 3incarceration and involve only such deprivations of liberty or 4property as are reasonably necessary to protect the public 5from the person's conduct in the underlying conviction or 6violation. In determining conditions, the Prisoner Review 7Board shall also consider the reasonableness of imposing 8additional conditions on the person and the extent to which 9the conditions impact the person's work, education, community 10service, financial, and family caregiving obligations. Such 11conditions shall include referral to an alcohol or drug abuse 12treatment program, as appropriate, if such person has 13previously been identified as having an alcohol or drug abuse 14problem. Such conditions may include that the person use an 15approved electronic monitoring device subject to Article 8A of 16Chapter V.17    (b) The Department shall assign personnel to assist 18persons eligible for parole in preparing a parole plan. Such 19Department personnel shall make a report of their efforts and 20findings to the Prisoner Review Board prior to its 21consideration of the case of such eligible person.22    (c) A copy of the conditions of his parole or release shall 23be signed by the parolee or releasee and given to him and to 24his supervising officer who shall report on his progress under 25the rules and regulations of the Prisoner Review Board. The 26supervising officer shall report violations to the Prisoner   HB5261- 62 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1Review Board and shall have the full power of peace officers in 2the arrest and retaking of any parolees or releasees or the 3officer may request the Department to issue a warrant for the 4arrest of any parolee or releasee who has allegedly violated 5his parole or release conditions.6    (c-1) The supervising officer shall request the Department 7to issue a parole violation warrant, and the Department shall 8issue a parole violation warrant, under the following 9circumstances:10        (1) if the parolee or releasee commits an act that 11    constitutes a felony using a firearm or knife,12        (2) if applicable, fails to comply with the 13    requirements of the Sex Offender Registration Act,14        (3) if the parolee or releasee is charged with:15            (A) a felony offense of domestic battery under 16        Section 12-3.2 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 17        Criminal Code of 2012,18            (B) aggravated domestic battery under Section 19        12-3.3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 20        Code of 2012,21            (C) stalking under Section 12-7.3 of the Criminal 22        Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012,23            (D) aggravated stalking under Section 12-7.4 of 24        the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012,25            (E) violation of an order of protection under 26        Section 12-3.4 or 12-30 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or   HB5261- 63 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        the Criminal Code of 2012, or2            (F) any offense that would require registration as 3        a sex offender under the Sex Offender Registration 4        Act, or 5        (4) if the parolee or releasee is on parole or 6    mandatory supervised release for a murder, a felony 7    murder, a Class X felony or a Class 1 felony violation of 8    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 9    any felony that requires registration as a sex offender 10    under the Sex Offender Registration Act and commits an act 11    that constitutes first degree murder, a felony murder, a 12    Class X felony, a Class 1 felony, a Class 2 felony, or a 13    Class 3 felony. 14     A sheriff or other peace officer may detain an alleged 15parole or release violator until a warrant for his return to 16the Department can be issued. The parolee or releasee may be 17delivered to any secure place until he can be transported to 18the Department. The officer or the Department shall file a 19violation report with notice of charges with the Prisoner 20Review Board. 21    (d) The supervising officer shall regularly advise and 22consult with the parolee or releasee, assist him in adjusting 23to community life, inform him of the restoration of his rights 24on successful completion of sentence under Section 5-5-5, and 25provide the parolee or releasee with an electronic copy of the 26Department of Corrections system of graduated responses as set   HB5261- 64 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1forth under subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subsection 2(b) of Section 10 of the Illinois Crime Reduction Act of 2009 3and any sanctions matrix based on that system. If the parolee 4or releasee has been convicted of a sex offense as defined in 5the Sex Offender Management Board Act, the supervising officer 6shall periodically, but not less than once a month, verify 7that the parolee or releasee is in compliance with paragraph 8(7.6) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-7. 9    (d-1) At least once every 6 months, the supervising 10officer of a parolee or releasee shall review the case of the 11parolee or releasee to assess the parolee's or releasee's 12progress and suitability for early discharge under subsection 13(b) of Section 3-3-8 and provide a recommendation for either 14early discharge or the continuation of parole or mandatory 15supervised release as previously ordered. The recommendation 16and the rationale for the recommendation shall be noted in the 17Department's case management system. Within 30 days of 18receiving the supervising officer's recommendation, the 19Department shall provide a copy of the final recommendation, 20in writing or electronically, to the Prisoner Review Board and 21to the parolee or releasee. If an early discharge 22recommendation was not provided, the supervising officer shall 23share the list of steps or requirements that the person must 24complete or meet to be granted an early discharge 25recommendation at a subsequent review under agency guidelines. 26The Department shall develop guidelines and policies to   HB5261- 65 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1support the regular review of parolees and releasees for early 2discharge consideration and the timely notification of the 3Prisoner Review Board when early discharge is recommended. 4    (d-2) Supervising officers shall schedule meetings, which 5are required under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 63-3-7 as a condition of parole or mandatory supervised 7release, at such times and locations that take into 8consideration the medical needs, caregiving obligations, and 9work schedule of a parolee or releasee. 10    (d-3) To comply with the provisions of subsection (d-2), 11in lieu of requiring the parolee or releasee to appear in 12person for the required reporting or meetings, supervising 13officers may utilize technology, including cellular and other 14electronic communication devices or platforms, that allows for 15communication between the supervised individual and the 16supervising officer. 17    (e) Supervising officers shall receive specialized 18training in the special needs of female releasees or parolees 19including the family reunification process.20    (f) The supervising officer shall keep such records as the 21Prisoner Review Board or Department may require. All records 22shall be entered in the master file of the individual.23(Source: P.A. 103-271, eff. 1-1-24.) 24    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-10)25    Sec. 5-4.5-10. OFFENSE CLASSIFICATIONS.  HB5261- 66 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    (a) FELONY CLASSIFICATIONS. Felonies are classified, for 2the purpose of sentencing, as follows:3        (1) First degree murder (as a separate class of 4    felony).5        (1.5) Felony murder (as a separate class of felony). 6        (2) Class X felonies.7        (3) Class 1 felonies.8        (4) Class 2 felonies.9        (5) Class 3 felonies.10        (6) Class 4 felonies.11    (b) MISDEMEANOR CLASSIFICATIONS. Misdemeanors are 12classified, for the purpose of sentencing, as follows:13        (1) Class A misdemeanors.14        (2) Class B misdemeanors.15        (3) Class C misdemeanors. 16    (c) PETTY AND BUSINESS OFFENSES. Petty offenses and 17business offenses are not classified.18(Source: P.A. 95-1052, eff. 7-1-09.) 19    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-21 new)20    Sec. 5-4.5-21. FELONY MURDER; SENTENCE. 21For felony murder:22    (a) TERM. The sentence of imprisonment shall be a 23determinate sentence of not less than 8 years and not more than 2440 years, subject to Section 5-4.5-115. The sentence of 25imprisonment for extended term felony murder, as provided in   HB5261- 67 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1Section 5-8-2, subject to Section 5-4.5-115, shall be a term 2not less than 16 years and not more than 80 years.3    (b) PERIODIC IMPRISONMENT. A sentence of periodic 4imprisonment shall be for a definite term of from 3 to 4 years, 5except as otherwise provided in Section 5-5-3 or 5-7-1.6    (c) IMPACT INCARCERATION. See Sections 5-8-1.1 and 5-8-1.2 7concerning eligibility for the impact incarceration program or 8the county impact incarceration program. 9    (d) PROBATION; CONDITIONAL DISCHARGE. Except as provided 10in Section 5-5-3 or 5-6-2, the period of probation or 11conditional discharge shall not exceed 4 years. The court 12shall specify the conditions of probation or conditional 13discharge as set forth in Section 5-6-3. In no case shall an 14offender be eligible for a disposition of probation or 15conditional discharge for felony murder committed while he or 16she was serving a term of probation or conditional discharge 17for a felony. 18    (e) FINE. Fines may be imposed as provided in subsection 19(b) of Section 5-4.5-50.20    (f) RESTITUTION. See Section 5-5-6 concerning restitution. 21    (g) CONCURRENT OR CONSECUTIVE SENTENCE. The sentence shall 22be concurrent or consecutive as provided in Section 5-8-4 and 23Section 5-4.5-50. 24    (h) DRUG COURT. See Section 20 of the Drug Court Treatment 25Act concerning eligibility for a drug court program. 26    (i) CREDIT FOR HOME DETENTION. See Section 5-4.5-100   HB5261- 68 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1concerning credit for time spent in home detention prior to 2judgment.3    (j) SENTENCE CREDIT. See Section 3-6-3 of this Code or the 4County Jail Good Behavior Allowance Act for rules and 5regulations for sentence credit.6    (k) ELECTRONIC MONITORING AND HOME DETENTION. See Section 75-8A-3 concerning eligibility for electronic monitoring and 8home detention. 9    (l) PAROLE; MANDATORY SUPERVISED RELEASE. Except as 10provided in Section 3-3-8 or 5-8-1, the parole or mandatory 11supervised release term shall be 2 years upon release from 12imprisonment.  13    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-95)14    Sec. 5-4.5-95. GENERAL RECIDIVISM PROVISIONS.15    (a) HABITUAL CRIMINALS.16        (1) Every person who has been twice convicted in any 17    state or federal court of an offense that contains the 18    same elements as an offense now (the date of the offense 19    committed after the 2 prior convictions) classified in 20    Illinois as a Class X felony, criminal sexual assault, 21    aggravated kidnapping, felony murder, or first degree 22    murder, and who is thereafter convicted of a Class X 23    felony, criminal sexual assault, felony murder, or first 24    degree murder, committed after the 2 prior convictions, 25    shall be adjudged an habitual criminal.  HB5261- 69 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        (2) The 2 prior convictions need not have been for the 2    same offense.3        (3) Any convictions that result from or are connected 4    with the same transaction, or result from offenses 5    committed at the same time, shall be counted for the 6    purposes of this Section as one conviction.7        (4) This Section does not apply unless each of the 8    following requirements are satisfied:9            (A) The third offense was committed after July 3, 10        1980.11            (B) The third offense was committed within 20 12        years of the date that judgment was entered on the 13        first conviction; provided, however, that time spent 14        in custody shall not be counted.15            (C) The third offense was committed after 16        conviction on the second offense.17            (D) The second offense was committed after 18        conviction on the first offense.19            (E) The first offense was committed when the 20        person was 21 years of age or older. 21        (5) Anyone who is adjudged an habitual criminal shall 22    be sentenced to a term of natural life imprisonment.23        (6) A prior conviction shall not be alleged in the 24    indictment, and no evidence or other disclosure of that 25    conviction shall be presented to the court or the jury 26    during the trial of an offense set forth in this Section   HB5261- 70 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    unless otherwise permitted by the issues properly raised 2    in that trial. After a plea or verdict or finding of guilty 3    and before sentence is imposed, the prosecutor may file 4    with the court a verified written statement signed by the 5    State's Attorney concerning any former conviction of an 6    offense set forth in this Section rendered against the 7    defendant. The court shall then cause the defendant to be 8    brought before it; shall inform the defendant of the 9    allegations of the statement so filed, and of his or her 10    right to a hearing before the court on the issue of that 11    former conviction and of his or her right to counsel at 12    that hearing; and unless the defendant admits such 13    conviction, shall hear and determine the issue, and shall 14    make a written finding thereon. If a sentence has 15    previously been imposed, the court may vacate that 16    sentence and impose a new sentence in accordance with this 17    Section.18        (7) A duly authenticated copy of the record of any 19    alleged former conviction of an offense set forth in this 20    Section shall be prima facie evidence of that former 21    conviction; and a duly authenticated copy of the record of 22    the defendant's final release or discharge from probation 23    granted, or from sentence and parole supervision (if any) 24    imposed pursuant to that former conviction, shall be prima 25    facie evidence of that release or discharge.26        (8) Any claim that a previous conviction offered by   HB5261- 71 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    the prosecution is not a former conviction of an offense 2    set forth in this Section because of the existence of any 3    exceptions described in this Section, is waived unless 4    duly raised at the hearing on that conviction, or unless 5    the prosecution's proof shows the existence of the 6    exceptions described in this Section.7        (9) If the person so convicted shows to the 8    satisfaction of the court before whom that conviction was 9    had that he or she was released from imprisonment, upon 10    either of the sentences upon a pardon granted for the 11    reason that he or she was innocent, that conviction and 12    sentence shall not be considered under this Section. 13    (b) When a defendant, over the age of 21 years, is 14convicted of a Class 1 or Class 2 forcible felony after having 15twice been convicted in any state or federal court of an 16offense that contains the same elements as an offense now (the 17date the Class 1 or Class 2 forcible felony was committed) 18classified in Illinois as a Class 2 or greater Class forcible 19felony and those charges are separately brought and tried and 20arise out of different series of acts, that defendant shall be 21sentenced as a Class X offender. This subsection does not 22apply unless:23        (1) the first forcible felony was committed after 24    February 1, 1978 (the effective date of Public Act 25    80-1099);26        (2) the second forcible felony was committed after   HB5261- 72 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    conviction on the first;2        (3) the third forcible felony was committed after 3    conviction on the second; and4        (4) the first offense was committed when the person 5    was 21 years of age or older.6    (c) (Blank). 7    A person sentenced as a Class X offender under this 8subsection (b) is not eligible to apply for treatment as a 9condition of probation as provided by Section 40-10 of the 10Substance Use Disorder Act (20 ILCS 301/40-10).11(Source: P.A. 100-3, eff. 1-1-18; 100-759, eff. 1-1-19; 12101-652, eff. 7-1-21.) 13    (730 ILCS 5/5-7-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-7-1)14    Sec. 5-7-1. Sentence of periodic imprisonment. 15    (a) A sentence of periodic imprisonment is a sentence of 16imprisonment during which the committed person may be released 17for periods of time during the day or night or for periods of 18days, or both, or if convicted of a felony, other than first 19degree murder, a Class X or Class 1 felony, committed to any 20county, municipal, or regional correctional or detention 21institution or facility in this State for such periods of time 22as the court may direct. Unless the court orders otherwise, 23the particular times and conditions of release shall be 24determined by the Department of Corrections, the sheriff, or 25the Superintendent of the house of corrections, who is   HB5261- 73 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1administering the program. 2    (b) A sentence of periodic imprisonment may be imposed to 3permit the defendant to: 4        (1) seek employment; 5        (2) work; 6        (3) conduct a business or other self-employed 7    occupation including housekeeping; 8        (4) attend to family needs; 9        (5) attend an educational institution, including 10    vocational education; 11        (6) obtain medical or psychological treatment; 12        (7) perform work duties at a county, municipal, or 13    regional correctional or detention institution or 14    facility; 15        (8) continue to reside at home with or without 16    supervision involving the use of an approved electronic 17    monitoring device, subject to Article 8A of Chapter V; or 18        (9) for any other purpose determined by the court. 19    (c) Except where prohibited by other provisions of this 20Code, the court may impose a sentence of periodic imprisonment 21for a felony or misdemeanor on a person who is 17 years of age 22or older. The court shall not impose a sentence of periodic 23imprisonment if it imposes a sentence of imprisonment upon the 24defendant in excess of 90 days. 25    (d) A sentence of periodic imprisonment shall be for a 26definite term of from 3 to 4 years for a felony murder, a Class   HB5261- 74 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b11 felony, 18 to 30 months for a Class 2 felony, and up to 18 2months, or the longest sentence of imprisonment that could be 3imposed for the offense, whichever is less, for all other 4offenses; however, no person shall be sentenced to a term of 5periodic imprisonment longer than one year if he is committed 6to a county correctional institution or facility, and in 7conjunction with that sentence participate in a county work 8release program comparable to the work and day release program 9provided for in Article 13 of Chapter III of this Code in State 10facilities. The term of the sentence shall be calculated upon 11the basis of the duration of its term rather than upon the 12basis of the actual days spent in confinement. No sentence of 13periodic imprisonment shall be subject to the good time credit 14provisions of Section 3-6-3 of this Code. 15    (e) When the court imposes a sentence of periodic 16imprisonment, it shall state: 17        (1) the term of such sentence; 18        (2) the days or parts of days which the defendant is to 19    be confined; 20        (3) the conditions. 21    (f) The court may issue an order of protection pursuant to 22the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 as a condition of a 23sentence of periodic imprisonment. The Illinois Domestic 24Violence Act of 1986 shall govern the issuance, enforcement 25and recording of orders of protection issued under this 26Section. A copy of the order of protection shall be   HB5261- 75 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1transmitted to the person or agency having responsibility for 2the case. 3    (f-5) An offender sentenced to a term of periodic 4imprisonment for a felony sex offense as defined in the Sex 5Offender Management Board Act shall be required to undergo and 6successfully complete sex offender treatment by a treatment 7provider approved by the Board and conducted in conformance 8with the standards developed under the Sex Offender Management 9Board Act. 10    (g) An offender sentenced to periodic imprisonment who 11undergoes mandatory drug or alcohol testing, or both, or is 12assigned to be placed on an approved electronic monitoring 13device, shall be ordered to pay the costs incidental to such 14mandatory drug or alcohol testing, or both, and costs 15incidental to such approved electronic monitoring in 16accordance with the defendant's ability to pay those costs. 17The county board with the concurrence of the Chief Judge of the 18judicial circuit in which the county is located shall 19establish reasonable fees for the cost of maintenance, 20testing, and incidental expenses related to the mandatory drug 21or alcohol testing, or both, and all costs incidental to 22approved electronic monitoring, of all offenders with a 23sentence of periodic imprisonment. The concurrence of the 24Chief Judge shall be in the form of an administrative order. 25The fees shall be collected by the clerk of the circuit court, 26except as provided in an administrative order of the Chief   HB5261- 76 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1Judge of the circuit court. The clerk of the circuit court 2shall pay all moneys collected from these fees to the county 3treasurer who shall use the moneys collected to defray the 4costs of drug testing, alcohol testing, and electronic 5monitoring. The county treasurer shall deposit the fees 6collected in the county working cash fund under Section 76-27001 or Section 6-29002 of the Counties Code, as the case 8may be. 9    (h) All fees and costs imposed under this Section for any 10violation of Chapters 3, 4, 6, and 11 of the Illinois Vehicle 11Code, or a similar provision of a local ordinance, and any 12violation of the Child Passenger Protection Act, or a similar 13provision of a local ordinance, shall be collected and 14disbursed by the circuit clerk as provided under the Criminal 15and Traffic Assessment Act. 16    The Chief Judge of the circuit court of the county may by 17administrative order establish a program for electronic 18monitoring of offenders, in which a vendor supplies and 19monitors the operation of the electronic monitoring device, 20and collects the fees on behalf of the county. The program 21shall include provisions for indigent offenders and the 22collection of unpaid fees. The program shall not unduly burden 23the offender and shall be subject to review by the Chief Judge. 24    The Chief Judge of the circuit court may suspend any 25additional charges or fees for late payment, interest, or 26damage to any device.   HB5261- 77 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    (i) A defendant at least 17 years of age who is convicted 2of a misdemeanor or felony in a county of 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants and who has not been previously convicted of a 4misdemeanor or a felony and who is sentenced to a term of 5periodic imprisonment may as a condition of his or her 6sentence be required by the court to attend educational 7courses designed to prepare the defendant for a high school 8diploma and to work toward receiving a high school diploma or 9to work toward passing high school equivalency testing or to 10work toward completing a vocational training program approved 11by the court. The defendant sentenced to periodic imprisonment 12must attend a public institution of education to obtain the 13educational or vocational training required by this subsection 14(i). The defendant sentenced to a term of periodic 15imprisonment shall be required to pay for the cost of the 16educational courses or high school equivalency testing if a 17fee is charged for those courses or testing. The court shall 18revoke the sentence of periodic imprisonment of the defendant 19who wilfully fails to comply with this subsection (i). The 20court shall resentence the defendant whose sentence of 21periodic imprisonment has been revoked as provided in Section 225-7-2. This subsection (i) does not apply to a defendant who 23has a high school diploma or has successfully passed high 24school equivalency testing. This subsection (i) does not apply 25to a defendant who is determined by the court to be a person 26with a developmental disability or otherwise mentally   HB5261- 78 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1incapable of completing the educational or vocational program. 2(Source: P.A. 100-987, eff. 7-1-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 3    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-1)4    Sec. 5-8-1. Natural life imprisonment; enhancements for 5use of a firearm; mandatory supervised release terms. 6    (a) Except as otherwise provided in the statute defining 7the offense or in Article 4.5 of Chapter V, a sentence of 8imprisonment for a felony shall be a determinate sentence set 9by the court under this Section, subject to Section 5-4.5-115 10of this Code, according to the following limitations:11        (1) for first degree murder,12            (a) (blank),13            (b) if a trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable 14        doubt that the murder was accompanied by exceptionally 15        brutal or heinous behavior indicative of wanton 16        cruelty or, except as set forth in subsection 17        (a)(1)(c) of this Section, that any of the aggravating 18        factors listed in subparagraph (b-5) are present, the 19        court may sentence the defendant, subject to Section 20        5-4.5-105, to a term of natural life imprisonment, or21            (b-5) a defendant who at the time of the 22        commission of the offense has attained the age of 18 or 23        more and who has been found guilty of first degree 24        murder may be sentenced to a term of natural life 25        imprisonment if:   HB5261- 79 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1                (1) the murdered individual was an inmate at 2            an institution or facility of the Department of 3            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 4            agency and was killed on the grounds thereof, or 5            the murdered individual was otherwise present in 6            such institution or facility with the knowledge 7            and approval of the chief administrative officer 8            thereof; 9                (2) the murdered individual was killed as a 10            result of the hijacking of an airplane, train, 11            ship, bus, or other public conveyance; 12                (3) the defendant committed the murder 13            pursuant to a contract, agreement, or 14            understanding by which he or she was to receive 15            money or anything of value in return for 16            committing the murder or procured another to 17            commit the murder for money or anything of value; 18                (4) the murdered individual was killed in the 19            course of another felony if: 20                    (A) the murdered individual: 21                        (i) was actually killed by the 22                    defendant, or 23                        (ii) received physical injuries 24                    personally inflicted by the defendant 25                    substantially contemporaneously with 26                    physical injuries caused by one or more   HB5261- 80 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1                    persons for whose conduct the defendant is 2                    legally accountable under Section 5-2 of 3                    this Code, and the physical injuries 4                    inflicted by either the defendant or the 5                    other person or persons for whose conduct 6                    he is legally accountable caused the death 7                    of the murdered individual; and (B) in 8                    performing the acts which caused the death 9                    of the murdered individual or which 10                    resulted in physical injuries personally 11                    inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 12                    individual under the circumstances of 13                    subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this 14                    clause (4), the defendant acted with the 15                    intent to kill the murdered individual or 16                    with the knowledge that his or her acts 17                    created a strong probability of death or 18                    great bodily harm to the murdered 19                    individual or another; and 20                    (B) in performing the acts which caused 21                the death of the murdered individual or which 22                resulted in physical injuries personally 23                inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 24                individual under the circumstances of 25                subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this clause 26                (4), the defendant acted with the intent to   HB5261- 81 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1                kill the murdered individual or with the 2                knowledge that his or her acts created a 3                strong probability of death or great bodily 4                harm to the murdered individual or another; 5                and 6                    (C) the other felony was an inherently 7                violent crime or the attempt to commit an 8                inherently violent crime. In this clause (C), 9                "inherently violent crime" includes, but is 10                not limited to, armed robbery, robbery, 11                predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 12                aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated 13                kidnapping, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 14                aggravated arson, aggravated stalking, 15                residential burglary, and home invasion; 16                (5) the defendant committed the murder with 17            intent to prevent the murdered individual from 18            testifying or participating in any criminal 19            investigation or prosecution or giving material 20            assistance to the State in any investigation or 21            prosecution, either against the defendant or 22            another; or the defendant committed the murder 23            because the murdered individual was a witness in 24            any prosecution or gave material assistance to the 25            State in any investigation or prosecution, either 26            against the defendant or another; for purposes of   HB5261- 82 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            this clause (5), "participating in any criminal 2            investigation or prosecution" is intended to 3            include those appearing in the proceedings in any 4            capacity such as trial judges, prosecutors, 5            defense attorneys, investigators, witnesses, or 6            jurors; 7                (6) the defendant, while committing an offense 8            punishable under Section 401, 401.1, 401.2, 405, 9            405.2, 407, or 407.1 or subsection (b) of Section 10            404 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 11            while engaged in a conspiracy or solicitation to 12            commit such offense, intentionally killed an 13            individual or counseled, commanded, induced, 14            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 15            murdered individual; 16                (7) the defendant was incarcerated in an 17            institution or facility of the Department of 18            Corrections at the time of the murder, and while 19            committing an offense punishable as a felony under 20            Illinois law, or while engaged in a conspiracy or 21            solicitation to commit such offense, intentionally 22            killed an individual or counseled, commanded, 23            induced, procured, or caused the intentional 24            killing of the murdered individual; 25                (8) the murder was committed in a cold, 26            calculated and premeditated manner pursuant to a   HB5261- 83 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            preconceived plan, scheme, or design to take a 2            human life by unlawful means, and the conduct of 3            the defendant created a reasonable expectation 4            that the death of a human being would result 5            therefrom; 6                (9) the defendant was a principal 7            administrator, organizer, or leader of a 8            calculated criminal drug conspiracy consisting of 9            a hierarchical position of authority superior to 10            that of all other members of the conspiracy, and 11            the defendant counseled, commanded, induced, 12            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 13            murdered person; 14                (10) the murder was intentional and involved 15            the infliction of torture. For the purpose of this 16            clause (10), torture means the infliction of or 17            subjection to extreme physical pain, motivated by 18            an intent to increase or prolong the pain, 19            suffering, or agony of the victim; 20                (11) the murder was committed as a result of 21            the intentional discharge of a firearm by the 22            defendant from a motor vehicle and the victim was 23            not present within the motor vehicle; 24                (12) the murdered individual was a person with 25            a disability and the defendant knew or should have 26            known that the murdered individual was a person   HB5261- 84 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            with a disability. For purposes of this clause 2            (12), "person with a disability" means a person 3            who suffers from a permanent physical or mental 4            impairment resulting from disease, an injury, a 5            functional disorder, or a congenital condition 6            that renders the person incapable of adequately 7            providing for his or her own health or personal 8            care; 9                (13) the murdered individual was subject to an 10            order of protection and the murder was committed 11            by a person against whom the same order of 12            protection was issued under the Illinois Domestic 13            Violence Act of 1986; 14                (14) the murdered individual was known by the 15            defendant to be a teacher or other person employed 16            in any school and the teacher or other employee is 17            upon the grounds of a school or grounds adjacent 18            to a school, or is in any part of a building used 19            for school purposes; 20                (15) the murder was committed by the defendant 21            in connection with or as a result of the offense of 22            terrorism as defined in Section 29D-14.9 of this 23            Code; 24                (16) the murdered individual was a member of a 25            congregation engaged in prayer or other religious 26            activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or   HB5261- 85 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            other building, structure, or place used for 2            religious worship; or 3                (17)(i) the murdered individual was a 4            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 5            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse; 6                (ii) the defendant knew or should have known 7            that the murdered individual was a physician, 8            physician assistant, psychologist, nurse, or 9            advanced practice registered nurse; and 10                (iii) the murdered individual was killed in 11            the course of acting in his or her capacity as a 12            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 13            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse, or 14            to prevent him or her from acting in that 15            capacity, or in retaliation for his or her acting 16            in that capacity. 17            (c) the court shall sentence the defendant to a 18        term of natural life imprisonment if the defendant, at 19        the time of the commission of the murder, had attained 20        the age of 18, and: 21                (i) has previously been convicted of first 22            degree murder under any state or federal law, or23                (ii) is found guilty of murdering more than 24            one victim, or25                (iii) is found guilty of murdering a peace 26            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker   HB5261- 86 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            when the peace officer, fireman, or emergency 2            management worker was killed in the course of 3            performing his official duties, or to prevent the 4            peace officer or fireman from performing his 5            official duties, or in retaliation for the peace 6            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 7            from performing his official duties, and the 8            defendant knew or should have known that the 9            murdered individual was a peace officer, fireman, 10            or emergency management worker, or11                (iv) is found guilty of murdering an employee 12            of an institution or facility of the Department of 13            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 14            agency, when the employee was killed in the course 15            of performing his official duties, or to prevent 16            the employee from performing his official duties, 17            or in retaliation for the employee performing his 18            official duties, or19                (v) is found guilty of murdering an emergency 20            medical technician - ambulance, emergency medical 21            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 22            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 23            medical assistance or first aid person while 24            employed by a municipality or other governmental 25            unit when the person was killed in the course of 26            performing official duties or to prevent the   HB5261- 87 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1            person from performing official duties or in 2            retaliation for performing official duties and the 3            defendant knew or should have known that the 4            murdered individual was an emergency medical 5            technician - ambulance, emergency medical 6            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 7            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 8            medical assistant or first aid personnel, or9                (vi) (blank), or10                (vii) is found guilty of first degree murder 11            and the murder was committed by reason of any 12            person's activity as a community policing 13            volunteer or to prevent any person from engaging 14            in activity as a community policing volunteer. For 15            the purpose of this Section, "community policing 16            volunteer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 17            Section 2-3.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.18            For purposes of clause (v), "emergency medical 19        technician - ambulance", "emergency medical technician -20         intermediate", and "emergency medical technician - 21        paramedic"have the meanings ascribed to them in the 22        Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act.23            (d)(i) if the person committed the offense while 24            armed with a firearm, 15 years shall be added to 25            the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;26            (ii) if, during the commission of the offense, the   HB5261- 88 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1        person personally discharged a firearm, 20 years shall 2        be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 3        court;4            (iii) if, during the commission of the offense, 5        the person personally discharged a firearm that 6        proximately caused great bodily harm, permanent 7        disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to 8        another person, 25 years or up to a term of natural 9        life shall be added to the term of imprisonment 10        imposed by the court.11        (2) (blank);12        (2.5) for a person who has attained the age of 18 years 13    at the time of the commission of the offense and who is 14    convicted under the circumstances described in subdivision 15    (b)(1)(B) of Section 11-1.20 or paragraph (3) of 16    subsection (b) of Section 12-13, subdivision (d)(2) of 17    Section 11-1.30 or paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 18    Section 12-14, subdivision (b)(1.2) of Section 11-1.40 or 19    paragraph (1.2) of subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1, 20    subdivision (b)(2) of Section 11-1.40 or paragraph (2) of 21    subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1 of the Criminal Code of 22    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the sentence shall be a 23    term of natural life imprisonment.24    (b) (Blank).25    (c) (Blank).26    (d) Subject to earlier termination under Section 3-3-8,   HB5261- 89 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1the parole or mandatory supervised release term shall be 2written as part of the sentencing order and shall be as 3follows:4        (1) for first degree murder or for the offenses of 5    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 6    criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual assault if 7    committed on or before December 12, 2005, 3 years;8        (1.1) except as otherwise provided in Section 3-3-8, 9    for felony murder, 2 years; 10        (1.5) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 11    subsection (d), for a Class X felony except for the 12    offenses of predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 13    aggravated criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual 14    assault if committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the 15    effective date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the 16    offense of aggravated child pornography under Section 17    11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 with sentencing under 18    subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code 19    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if committed on or 20    after January 1, 2009, and except for the offense of 21    obscene depiction of a purported child with sentencing 22    under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal 23    Code of 2012, 18 months; 24        (2) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 25    subsection (d), for a Class 1 felony or a Class 2 felony 26    except for the offense of criminal sexual assault if   HB5261- 90 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the effective 2    date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the offenses of 3    manufacture and dissemination of child sexual abuse 4    material under clauses (a)(1) and (a)(2) of Section 5    11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 6    of 2012, if committed on or after January 1, 2009, and 7    except for the offense of obscene depiction of a purported 8    child under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 9    11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 12 months;10        (3) except as provided in paragraph (4), (6), or (7) 11    of this subsection (d), for a Class 3 felony or a Class 4 12    felony, 6 months; no later than 45 days after the onset of 13    the term of mandatory supervised release, the Prisoner 14    Review Board shall conduct a discretionary discharge 15    review pursuant to the provisions of Section 3-3-8, which 16    shall include the results of a standardized risk and needs 17    assessment tool administered by the Department of 18    Corrections; the changes to this paragraph (3) made by 19    Public Act 102-1104 apply to all individuals released on 20    mandatory supervised release on or after December 6, 2022 21    (the effective date of Public Act 102-1104), including 22    those individuals whose sentences were imposed prior to 23    December 6, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 24    102-1104);25        (4) for defendants who commit the offense of predatory 26    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal   HB5261- 91 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    sexual assault, or criminal sexual assault, on or after 2    December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 3    94-715), or who commit the offense of aggravated child 4    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 5    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 6    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 7    manufacture of child sexual abuse material, or 8    dissemination of child sexual abuse material after January 9    1, 2009, or who commit the offense of obscene depiction of 10    a purported child under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of 11    Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or who commit 12    the offense of obscene depiction of a purported child with 13    sentencing under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the 14    Criminal Code of 2012, the term of mandatory supervised 15    release shall range from a minimum of 3 years to a maximum 16    of the natural life of the defendant;17        (5) if the victim is under 18 years of age, for a 18    second or subsequent offense of aggravated criminal sexual 19    abuse or felony criminal sexual abuse, 4 years, at least 20    the first 2 years of which the defendant shall serve in an 21    electronic monitoring or home detention program under 22    Article 8A of Chapter V of this Code;23        (6) for a felony domestic battery, aggravated domestic 24    battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, and a felony 25    violation of an order of protection, 4 years; 26        (7) for any felony described in paragraph (a)(2)(ii),   HB5261- 92 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1    (a)(2)(iii), (a)(2)(iv), (a)(2)(vi), (a)(2.1), (a)(2.3), 2    (a)(2.4), (a)(2.5), or (a)(2.6) of Article 5, Section 3    3-6-3 of the Unified Code of Corrections requiring an 4    inmate to serve a minimum of 85% of their court-imposed 5    sentence, except for the offenses of predatory criminal 6    sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal sexual 7    assault, and criminal sexual assault if committed on or 8    after December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 9    94-715) and except for the offense of aggravated child 10    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 11    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 12    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 13    if committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for 14    the offense of obscene depiction of a purported child with 15    sentencing under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the 16    Criminal Code of 2012, and except as provided in paragraph 17    (4) or paragraph (6) of this subsection (d), the term of 18    mandatory supervised release shall be as follows:19            (A) Class X felony, 3 years;20            (B) Class 1 or Class 2 felonies, 2 years;21            (C) Class 3 or Class 4 felonies, 1 year. 22    (e) (Blank).23    (f) (Blank).24    (g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act and 25of Public Act 101-652: (i) the provisions of paragraph (3) of 26subsection (d) are effective on July 1, 2022 and shall apply to   HB5261- 93 -LRB104 16942 RLC 30356 b1all individuals convicted on or after the effective date of 2paragraph (3) of subsection (d); and (ii) the provisions of 3paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of subsection (d) are effective on 4July 1, 2021 and shall apply to all individuals convicted on or 5after the effective date of paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of 6subsection (d).7(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; 8104-245, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)